Massachusetts, session 194th, S304.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 23A of the General Laws is hereby amended in Section 3A by striking out-
"Gateway municipality'', a municipality with a population greater than 35,000 and less
than 250,000, a median household income below the commonwealth's average and a rate of
educational attainment of a bachelor's degree or above that is below the commonwealth's
average.
and inserting the following-
"Gateway municipality'', a municipality with a population greater than 35,000 and less
than 250,000, or two or more municipalities forming an inter-municipal agreement for this
purpose with a combined population greater than 35,000 and less than 250,000, a median
of 2

household income below the commonwealth's average and a rate of educational attainment of a
bachelor's degree or above that is below the commonwealth's average.
of 2